Illinois, session 104th, HB5674.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4ARTICLE 15    Section 1. The following named amounts, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 7purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated from the Illinois 8Workers' Compensation Commission Operations Fund to the 9Illinois Workers' Compensation Commission:10GENERAL OFFICE11  For Personal Services:12   Regular Positions................................9,410,80013   Arbitrators......................................6,081,90014  For State Contributions to State15   Employees' Retirement System.....................4,323,00016  For Arbitrators' Retirement System................2,793,80017  For State Contributions to Social Security........1,185,20018  For Group Insurance...............................3,200,00019  For Contractual Services..........................2,100,00020  For Travel..........................................260,00021  For Commodities......................................20,00022  For Printing.........................................10,00023  For Equipment........................................10,000  HB5674- 2 -OMB104 00252 LNW 10252 b1  For Telecommunication Services......................150,0002  For Electronic Data Processing....................3,100,0003    Total                                         $32,644,700 4    Section 5. The amount of $80,000, or so much thereof as may 5be necessary, is appropriated from the Illinois Workers' 6Compensation Commission Operations Fund to Illinois Workers' 7Compensation Commission for costs associated with the 8establishment of the Medical Fee Schedule and other provisions 9of the Workers' Compensation Act. 10    Section 10. The amount of $10,000, or so much thereof as 11may be necessary, is appropriated from the Illinois Workers' 12Compensation Commission Operations Fund to Illinois Workers' 13Compensation Commission for costs associated with the 14establishment, administration and operations of the Insurance 15Compliance Division of the workers' compensation anti-fraud 16program administered by Illinois Workers' Compensation 17Commission. 18    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 192026.